Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2626.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 21-27-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-27 entitled "Sanitation
in Food Establishments" is hereby amended to read as follows:
21-27-10. Registration of food businesses.
(a) No person shall operate a food business as defined in § 21-27-1 unless he or she
annually registers the business with the state director of health; provided, that food businesses
conducted by nonprofit organizations, hospitals, public institutions, farmers markets, roadside farm
stands, or any municipality shall be exempt from payment of any required fee. Additionally, no
license fee shall be required for an establishment that:
(1) Holds a Class C liquor license pursuant to § 3-7-8; and
(2) Complies with the license limits set forth in § 3-7-8(b).
(b) In order to set the registration renewal dates so that all activities for each establishment
can be combined on one registration instead of on several registrations, the registration renewal
date shall be set by the department of health. The registration period shall be for twelve (12) months
commencing on the registration renewal date. Any renewal registration fee shall be at the full,
annual rate regardless of the date of renewal. Any fee for a first-time application shall have the
registration fee pro-rated based upon the date of issuance of registration. If the registration renewal
date is changed, the department may make an adjustment to the fees of registered establishments,
not to exceed the annual registration fee, in order to implement the changes in registration renewal
date. Registrations issued under this chapter may be suspended or revoked for cause. Any

registration or license shall be posted in a place accessible and prominently visible to an agent of
the director.
(c) Registration with the director of health shall be based upon satisfactory compliance
with all laws and regulations of the director applicable to the food business for which registration
is required.
(d) The director of health is authorized to adopt regulations necessary for the
implementation of this chapter.
(e) Classification for registration shall be as follows:
(1) In-state and out-of-state food processors that sell food in Rhode Island (Wholesale)
(2) Food processors (Retail)
(3) Food service establishments:
(i) 50 seats or less
(ii) More than 50 seats
(iii) Mobile food service units
(iv) Industrial caterer or food vending machine commissary
(v) Cultural heritage educational facility
(4) Vending machine sites or location:
(i) Three (3) or less machines
(ii) Four (4) to ten (10) machines
(iii) Eleven (11) or more machines
(5) Retail markets:
(i) 1 to 2 cash registers
(ii) 3 to 5 cash registers
(iii) 6 or more cash registers
(6) Retail food peddler (meat, seafood, dairy, and frozen dessert products)
(7) Food warehouses
(f) In no instance, where an individual food business has more than one activity eligible
under this chapter for state registration within a single location, shall the business be required to
pay more than a single fee for the one highest classified activity listed in subsection (e) of this
section; provided, that, where several separate but identically classified activities are located within
the same building and under the management and jurisdiction of one person, one fee shall be
required. In each of the instances in this subsection, each activity shall be separately registered.
(g) Fees for registration of the above classifications shall be as set forth in § 23-1-54.
(h) The department shall also annually charge food service establishments, an additional
LC003790 - Page 2 of 7

fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) per year, which shall be transferred to the department of labor and
training and shall be deposited into the hospitality training restricted receipt account, which shall
be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of § 35-4-27. Subject to appropriation by the
general assembly, these funds shall be used to provide hospitality industry workforce training
grants including, but not limited to, certified food and alcohol safety training programs offered in
multiple languages.
SECTION 2. Section 35-4-27 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-4 entitled "State Funds"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-4-27. Indirect cost recoveries on restricted receipt accounts.
Indirect cost recoveries of fifteen percent (15%) of cash receipts shall be transferred from
all restricted receipt accounts, to be recorded as general revenues in the general fund. However,
there shall be no transfer from cash receipts with restrictions received exclusively: (1) From
contributions from nonprofit charitable organizations; (2) From the assessment of indirect cost-
recovery rates on federal grant funds; or (3) Through transfers from state agencies to the department
of administration for the payment of debt service. These indirect cost recoveries shall be applied to
all accounts, unless prohibited by federal law or regulation, court order, or court settlement. The
following restricted receipt accounts shall not be subject to the provisions of this section:
Executive Office of Health and Human Services
HIV Care Grant Drug Rebates
Health System Transformation Project
Rhode Island Statewide Opioid Abatement Account
HCBS Support-ARPA
HCBS Admin Support-ARPA
Department of Human Services
Organ Transplant Fund
Veterans’ home — Restricted account
Veterans’ home — Resident benefits
Pharmaceutical Rebates Account
Demand Side Management Grants
Veteran’s Cemetery Memorial Fund
Donations — New Veterans’ Home Construction
Commodity Supplemental Food Program-Claims
Department of Health
Pandemic medications and equipment account
LC003790 - Page 3 of 7

Miscellaneous Donations/Grants from Non-Profits
State Loan Repayment Match
Healthcare Information Technology
Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Eleanor Slater non-Medicaid third-party payor account
Hospital Medicare Part D Receipts
RICLAS Group Home Operations
Group Home Facility Improvement Fund
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Emergency and public communication access account
Department of Environmental Management
National heritage revolving fund
Environmental response fund II
Underground storage tanks registration fees
De Coppet Estate Fund
Rhode Island Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission
Historic preservation revolving loan fund
Historic Preservation loan fund — Interest revenue
Department of Public Safety
E-911 Uniform Emergency Telephone System
Forfeited property — Retained
Forfeitures — Federal
Forfeited property — Gambling
Donation — Polygraph and Law Enforcement Training
Rhode Island State Firefighter’s League Training Account
Fire Academy Training Fees Account
Attorney General
Forfeiture of property
Federal forfeitures
Attorney General multi-state account
Forfeited property — Gambling
Department of Administration
Health Insurance Market Integrity Fund
RI Health Benefits Exchange
LC003790 - Page 4 of 7

Information Technology restricted receipt account
Restore and replacement — Insurance coverage
Convention Center Authority rental payments
Investment Receipts — TANS
OPEB System Restricted Receipt Account
Grants Management Administration
Office of Energy Resources
OER Reconciliation Funding
RGGI Executive Climate Change Coordinating Council Projects
Electric Vehicle Charging Stations Operating and Maintenance Account
Clean Transportation Programs
Department of Housing
Housing Resources and Homelessness Restricted Receipt Account
Housing Production Fund
Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Fund
Department of Revenue
Car Rental Tax/Surcharge-Warwick Share
DMV Modernization Project
Jobs Tax Credit Redemption Fund
Legislature
Audit of federal assisted programs
Department of Children, Youth and Families
Children’s Trust Accounts — SSI
Military Staff
RI Military Family Relief Fund
RI National Guard Counterdrug Program
Treasury
Admin. Expenses — State Retirement System
Retirement — Treasury Investment Options
Defined Contribution — Administration - RR
Violent Crimes Compensation — Refunds
Treasury Research Fellowship
Business Regulation
Banking Division Reimbursement Account
LC003790 - Page 5 of 7

Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner Reimbursement Account
Securities Division Reimbursement Account
Commercial Licensing and Racing and Athletics Division Reimbursement Account
Insurance Division Reimbursement Account
Historic Preservation Tax Credit Account
Rhode Island Cannabis Control Commission
Marijuana Trust Fund
Social Equity Assistance Fund
Judiciary
Arbitration Fund Restricted Receipt Account
Third-Party Grants
RI Judiciary Technology Surcharge Account
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Statewide Student Transportation Services Account
School for the Deaf Fee-for-Service Account
School for the Deaf — School Breakfast and Lunch Program
Davies Career and Technical School Local Education Aid Account
Davies — National School Breakfast & Lunch Program
School Construction Services
Office of the Postsecondary Commissioner
Tuition Savings Program Fund
Higher Education and Industry Center
IGT STEM Scholarships
Department of Labor and Training
Job Development Fund
Contractor Training Restricted Receipt Account
Hospitality Training Restricted Receipt Account
Workers’ Compensation Administrative Account
Rhode Island Council on the Arts
Governors’ Portrait Donation Fund
Statewide records management system account
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027
========
LC003790
========
LC003790 - Page 6 of 7